sk-SK: Potreba zavlažovania: Vysoké; Nízke; Stredné; Iné
fi: Kastelutarpeet: Korkea; Matala; Kohtalainen; Muu
pt-PT: Necessidades de rega: Elevado; Baixo; Moderado; Outro
pl: Zapotrzebowanie na wodę: Wysokie; Niskie; Umiarkowane; Inne
ru: Потребности в поливе: Обильный; Редкий; Умеренный; Другое
tr: Sulama ihtiyaçları: Yüksek; Düşük; Ortala; Diğer
zh-CN: 浇水需求: 高; 低; 中; 其他
de: Bewässerungsbedarf: Hoch; Niedrig; Mäßig; Sonstiges
da: Vandingsbehov: Høj; Lav; Moderat; Andet
th: ความต้องการน้ำ: สูง; ต่ำ; ปานกลาง; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Potrebe za zalijevanjem: Visoki; Niski; Umjereno; Ostalo
lt-LT: Laistymo poreikiai: Aukštas; Žemas; Vidutinis; Kita
hu: Öntözési igények: Magas; Alacsony; Mérsékelt; Egyéb
sv: Vattningsbehov: Hög; Låg; Måttlig; Annat
en: Watering needs: High; Low; Moderate; Other
nl: Waterbehoefte: Hoog; Laag; Gemiddeld; Overig
bg-BG: Нужда от поливане: Високо; Ниско; Умерено; Друго
ro-RO: Necesitățile de udare: Ridicat; Scăzut; Moderat; Altele
cs: Požadavky na zalévání: Vysoká potřeba zavlažování; Nízká potřeba zavlažování; Střední potřeba zavlažování; Jiné
nb: Vanningsbehov: Høy; Lav; Moderat; Annet
sl-SI: Potrebe po zalivanju: Visok; Nizek; Zmerna; Druga
zh-TW: 澆水需求: 高; 低; 中; 其他
vi: Nhu cầu tưới nước: Cao; Trễ; Vừa phải; Khác
it: Necessità di irrigazione: Alto; Basso; Moderato; Altro
el: Ανάγκες ποτίσματος: Υψηλές; Χαμηλές; Μέτριες; Άλλο
pt-BR: Necessidades de rega: Alta; Baixa; Moderado; Outro
ko: 물주기 요구 수준: 높음; 낮음; 보통; 기타
ja: 水やりの必要性: 高; 低; 中; その他
es: Necesidades de riego: Alto; Bajo; Moderado; Otros
fr: Besoins en arrosage: Haute; Basse; Modéré; Autre